ja: トリートメントのタイプ: レーザー; 口腔; トピカル; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de tratamento: Laser; Oral; Tópico; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de tratament: Laser; Oral; Topic; Altele
en: Treatment type: Laser; Oral; Topical; Other
vi: Loại điều trị: Laser; Thuốc uống; Thuốc bôi; Khác
es: Tipo de tratamiento: Láser; Oral; Topical; Otros
pl: Typ leczenia: Laser; Ustnie; Miejscowo; Inne
fr: Type de traitement: Laser; Oral; Topique; Autre
bg-BG: Вид лечение: Лазерно; Орално; Топично; Други
fi: Hoitotyyppi: Laser; Oraalinen; Ihon pinnalle; Muu
hr-HR: Vrsta tretmana: Laser; Oralno; Lokalno; Ostalo
cs: Typ ošetření/procedury: Laser; Ústní; Topická léčba; Jiné
ru: Тип лечения: Лазерный; Оральный; Местный; Другой
sl-SI: Vrsta zdravljenja: Laser; Oralno; Topično; Drugo
tr: Uygulama Türü: Lazer; Oral; Topikal; Diğer
de: Behandlungstyp: Laser; Oral; Aktuell; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 治疗类型: 激光; 口服; 专题; 其他
sk-SK: Typ liečby: Laserový; Ústny; Lokálny; Iné
hu: Kezelés típusa: Lézer; Orális; Helyi; Egyéb
lt-LT: Procedūros tipas: Lazerinis; Geriamas; Vietinis; Kita
zh-TW: 治療類型: 雷射; 口腔; 局部; 其他
sv: Behandlingstyp: Laser; Oral; Aktuell; Övrigt
da: Behandlingstype: Laser; Oral; Topisk; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de tratamento: Laser; Oral; Tópico; Outro
el: Τύπος θεραπείας: Λέιζερ; Στοματική χρήση; Τοπικός; Άλλο
it: Tipo di trattamento: Laser; Orale; Tipico; Altro
nl: Behandelingstype: Laser; Mondeling; Lokaal; Andere
ko: 트리트먼트 유형: 레이저; 구강; 토픽; 기타
nb: Behandlingstype: Laser; Oral; Lokal; Annet
th: ประเภทการรักษา: เลเซอร์; ช่องปาก; เฉพาะที่; อื่นๆ